Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.330

Contributions.

(1) Each employee who is a member of the retirement system shall contribute six percent of his or her total compensation earnable. Effective January 1, 1987, however, no contributions are required for any calendar month in which the member is not granted service credit. The officer responsible for making up the payroll shall deduct from the compensation of each member, on each and every payroll of such member for each and every payroll period subsequent to the date on which he or she became a member of the retirement system the contribution as provided by this section.

(2) Any member may, pursuant to regulations formulated from time to time by the department, provide for himself or herself, by means of an increased rate of contribution to his or her account in the employees' savings fund, an increased prospective retirement allowance pursuant to RCW 41.40.190 and 41.40.185.

(3) The officer responsible for making up the payroll shall deduct from the compensation of each member covered by the provisions of RCW 41.40.190(5) and 41.40.185(4) on each and every payroll of such member for each and every payroll period subsequent to the date on which he or she thereafter becomes a member of the retirement system, an amount equal to seven and one-half percent of such member's compensation earnable.

[ 1990 c 8 s 4; 1986 c 268 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 190 s 12; 1972 ex.s. c 151 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 271 s 10; 1969 c 128 s 12; 1953 c 200 s 17; 1951 c 50 s 11; 1949 c 240 s 24; 1947 c 274 s 34; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-34.]

NOTES:

Findings—1990 c 8: See note following RCW 41.50.065.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 190: See note following RCW 41.40.010.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 271: See note following RCW 41.32.260.

Severability—1969 c 128: See note following RCW 41.40.010.

Members' retirement contributions—Payment by employer: RCW 41.04.445.